Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 204. Preparation of Livestock and Poultry Products
§ 3308.
Prohibited acts in general.

No person shall, with respect to any livestock or poultry or any livestock products or poultry products:

slaughter any livestock or poultry or prepare any products which are capable of use as human food, at any establishment preparing the products solely for intrastate commerce, except in compliance with the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter;

sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any products which:

are capable for use as human food; and

are adulterated or misbranded at the time of the sale, transportation, offer for sale or transportation, or receipt for transportation; or

have not been inspected and passed unless they are exempt from inspection pursuant to rules adopted by the Secretary; or

do, with respect to any of these products which are capable of use as human food, any act while they are being transported in intrastate commerce or held for sale after transportation, which is intended to cause or has the effect of causing the products to be adulterated or misbranded.

No person shall sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, or from an official establishment, any slaughtered poultry from which the blood, feathers, feet, head or viscera have not been removed in accordance with rules adopted by the Secretary except as may be authorized by rules.

No person shall violate any provision of this chapter, the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, the orders of the Secretary, or of his or her inspectors.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

1989, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3309.
Additional prohibited acts; official devices, marks, and certificates.

No brand manufacturer, printer, or other person shall cast, print, lithograph, or otherwise make any device containing any official mark or simulation, or any label bearing any mark or simulation, or any form of official certificate or simulation, except as authorized by the Secretary.

No person shall:

forge any official device, mark, or certificate;

without authorization from the Secretary use any official device, mark, or certificate, or simulation, or alter, detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate;

contrary to the rules adopted by the Secretary, fail to use, or to detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate;

knowingly possess, without promptly notifying the Secretary or his or her representative, any official device or any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official certificate or any device or label of any carcass of any animal including poultry, or part or product of any animal including poultry, bearing any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official mark;

knowingly make any false statement in any shipper’s certificate or other nonofficial or official certificate provided for in the rules prescribed by the Secretary; or

knowingly represent that any product has been inspected and passed, or exempted under this chapter when it has not been inspected and passed, or exempted.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3310.
Additional prohibited acts: labeling; denaturing; dealing in dead, dying, disabled, and diseased animals; licensing.

No person shall sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any carcasses of horses, mules, or other equines or parts of these carcasses, or the meat or meat food products of these carcasses unless they are plainly and conspicuously marked or labeled or otherwise identified as required by rules prescribed by the Secretary to show the kinds of animals from which they were derived.

No person shall buy, sell, transport, or offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any livestock products or poultry products which are not intended for use as human food unless they are denatured or otherwise identified as required by the rules of the Secretary or are naturally inedible by humans.

No person engaged in the business of buying, selling, or transporting in intrastate commerce, dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals, or any parts of the carcasses of any animals that died other than by slaughter, shall buy, sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation in commerce, any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry or the products of any of these animals that died other than by slaughter, unless the transaction or transportation is made in accordance with rules which the Secretary may prescribe to assure that the animals, or the unwholesome parts or products, will be prevented from being used for human food purposes.

No person shall engage in the business of buying, selling, preparing, processing, packing, storing, transporting, or otherwise handling meat, meat food products, or poultry products, unless that person holds a valid license issued in accordance with section 3306 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3311.
Specific offenses; penalties.

Any person that gives, pays, or offers, directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value to any officer or employee of this State authorized to perform any duties prescribed by this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter, with intent to influence the officer or employee in the discharge of any duty, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000.00 or by imprisonment for not more than five years, or both. Any officer or employee of this State authorized to perform the duties prescribed by this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter, who accepts any money, gift, or other thing of value from any persons, given with intent to influence his or her official action, or who shall receive or accept from any person engaged in intrastate commerce any gift, money, or other thing of value given with any purpose or intent whatsoever, shall be subject to the penalties provided in

13 V.S.A. § 1102

.

Any person that forcibly assaults, resists, or intimidates any inspector, or other person, engaged in the performance of his or her official duties under this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter, shall be subject to the penalties provided in

13 V.S.A. § 1023

. Any person who impedes, interferes, or hinders any inspector, or other person, engaged in the performance of his or her official duties under this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter, shall be subject to the penalties provided in

13 V.S.A. § 3001

. Whoever in the commission of these acts uses a deadly or dangerous weapon, or who purposely or knowingly causes serious bodily injury to an inspector or other person engaged in the performance of his or her official duties under this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter, shall be subject to the penalties provided in 13 V.S.A. chapter 53. Any person engaged in official duties under this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter shall be considered a law enforcement officer for purposes of determining a penalty under 13 V.S.A. chapter 53.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986.

§ 3311a.
Livestock; inspection; licensing; personal slaughter; itinerant slaughter.

As used in this section:

“Assist in the slaughter of livestock” means the act of slaughtering or butchering an animal and shall not mean the farmer’s provision of a site on the farm for slaughter, provision of implements for slaughter, or the service of disposal of the carcass or offal from slaughter.

“Sanitary conditions” means a site on a farm that is:

clean and free of contaminants; and

located or designed in a way to prevent:

the occurrence of water pollution; and

the adulteration of the livestock or the slaughtered meat.

The requirement for a license under section 3306 of this title or for inspection under this chapter shall not apply to the slaughter by an owner of livestock that the owner raised for the owner’s exclusive use or for the use of members of his or her household and his or her nonpaying guests and employees.

The requirement for a license under section 3306 of this title or for inspection under this chapter shall not apply to the slaughter of livestock that occurs in a manner that meets all of the following requirements:

A person or persons purchases livestock from a farmer who raised the livestock.

The farmer is registered with the Secretary, on a form provided by the Secretary, as selling livestock for slaughter under this subsection.

The individual or individuals who purchased the livestock performs the act of slaughtering the livestock, as the owner of the livestock.

The act of slaughter occurs, after approval from the farmer who sold the livestock, on a site on the farm where the livestock was purchased.

The slaughter is conducted under sanitary conditions.

The farmer who sold the livestock to the individual or individuals does not assist in the slaughter of the livestock.

Not more than the following number of livestock per year are slaughtered under this subsection:

30 swine;

10 cattle;

80 sheep or goats; or

any combination of swine, cattle, sheep, or goats, provided that not more than 12,000 pounds of the live weight of livestock are slaughtered per year.

The farmer who sold the livestock to the individual or individuals maintains a record of each slaughter conducted under this subsection and reports quarterly to the Secretary, on a form provided by the Secretary, on or before April 15 for the calendar quarter ending March 31, on or before July 15 for the calendar quarter ending June 30, on or before October 15 for the calendar quarter ending September 30, and on or before January 15 for the calendar quarter ending December 31. If a farmer fails to report slaughter activity conducted under this subsection, the Secretary, in addition to any enforcement action available under this chapter or chapter 1 of this title, may suspend the authority of the farmer to sell animals to an individual or individuals for slaughter under this subsection.

The slaughtered livestock may be halved or quartered by the individual or individuals who purchased the livestock but solely for the purpose of transport from the farm.

The livestock is slaughtered according to a humane method, as that term is defined in subdivision 3131(6) of this title.

The requirement for a license under section 3306 of this title or for inspection under this chapter shall not apply to an itinerant slaughterer engaged in the act of itinerant livestock slaughter or itinerant poultry slaughter.

An itinerant slaughterer may slaughter livestock owned by a person on the farm where the livestock was raised under the following conditions:

the meat from the slaughter of the livestock is distributed only as whole, halved, or quartered carcasses to the person who owned the animal for his or her personal use or for use by members of his or her household or nonpaying guests;

the slaughter is conducted under sanitary conditions; and

the livestock is slaughtered according to a humane method, as that term is defined in subdivision 3131(6) of this title.

A carcass or offal from slaughter conducted under this section shall be disposed of according to the requirements under the required agricultural practices for the management of agricultural waste.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 83

, § 4, eff. June 10, 2013; amended

2015, No. 64

, § 13;

2015, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 10, 2016;

2019, No. 83

, § 6;

2021, No. 47

, § 1a.

§ 3312.
Inspection; exceptions.

Not intended for human food. Inspection shall not be provided under this chapter at any establishment for the slaughter of livestock or poultry or the preparation of any livestock products or poultry products which are not intended for use as human food, but these products shall, prior to their offer for sale or transportation in intrastate commerce, unless naturally inedible by humans, be denatured or otherwise identified as prescribed by rules of the Secretary to deter their use for human food. These licensed establishments shall be subject to periodic review.

1,000 bird exemption. Inspection shall not be required for the slaughter or preparation of poultry products of the producer’s own raising on the producer’s own premises, whether or not they are intended for use as human food if:

fewer than 1,000 birds are slaughtered annually;

no poultry products are offered for sale or transportation in interstate commerce; and

the poultry products are only sold, as whole birds only, from the farm, at a farmers’ market, or to a food restaurant licensed by the Commissioner of Health, or are for personal use.

5,000 bird exemption.

Inspection shall not be required for the slaughter or preparation of poultry products of the producer’s own raising on the producer’s own premises, whether or not they are intended for use as human food if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

No more than 5,000 birds are slaughtered annually.

No poultry products are offered for sale or transportation in interstate commerce.

The poultry products are only sold, as whole birds, from the farm, at a farmers’ market, directly to household consumers, or to a food restaurant licensed by the Commissioner of Health, or are for personal use.

The producer’s facility is not used to slaughter or process poultry by any other person or business.

The producer does not purchase birds for resale that have been processed under the exemption under this section.

The poultry are healthy when slaughtered.

The poultry are slaughtered and otherwise processed and handled under sanitary standards, practices, and procedures that result in the preparation of poultry products that are sound, clean, and fit for human food when distributed by the producer.

As used in this subsection, “sanitary standards, practices, and procedures” means:

the poultry are slaughtered in a facility that is soundly constructed, kept in good repair, and of sufficient size;

rooms or compartments in which an edible product is processed, handled, or stored shall be separated from areas used for slaughter, provided that a producer may use heavy duty plastic sheeting as a means of separation when such sheeting prevents the creation of insanitary conditions;

all food-contact surfaces and nonfood-contact surfaces in the facility are cleaned and sanitized as frequently as necessary to prevent the creation of insanitary conditions and the adulteration of the products;

pest control shall be adequate to prevent the harborage of pests on the grounds and within the facility;

substances used for sanitation and pest control shall be safe and effective under the conditions of use, and shall not be applied or stored in a manner that will result in the contamination of edible products;

sewage from human waste shall be disposed of in a sewage system separate from other drainage lines; or
(F) (i) sewage from human waste shall be disposed of in a sewage system separate from other drainage lines; or

sewage is disposed of through other means to prevent the creation of insanitary conditions or the backup into the area where the product is processed, handled, or stored, including disposal of process wastewater through on-farm composting under the Required Agricultural Practices;

a supply of potable water of suitable temperature is provided in all areas where required for processing the product, cleaning rooms, cleaning equipment, cleaning utensils, and cleaning packaging materials;

equipment and utensils used for processing or handling edible product are of a material that is cleanable and sanitizable;

receptacles used for storing inedible material are of such material and construction that their use will not result in adulteration of any edible product or create insanitary conditions;

a person working in contact with the poultry products, food-contact surfaces, and product-packaging material shall maintain hygienic practices; and

clothing worn by persons who handle poultry products shall be of material that is cleanable or disposable, and garments shall be cleaned or changed as often as necessary to prevent adulteration of poultry products or the creation of insanitary conditions.

20,000 bird exemption. Inspection shall not be required for the slaughter or preparation of poultry products of the producer’s own raising on the producer’s own premises, whether or not they are intended for use as human food if:

no more than 20,000 birds are slaughtered annually;

no birds are offered for sale or transportation in interstate commerce;

the poultry products are only sold, as whole birds, from the farm, at a farmers’ market, directly to household consumers, or to a food restaurant licensed by the Commissioner of Health, or are for personal use;

the producer’s facility is not used to slaughter or process poultry by any other person or business;

the producer does not purchase birds for resale that have been processed under the exemption under this section;

the poultry are healthy when slaughtered; and

the poultry are slaughtered and otherwise processed and handled according to the sanitary performance standards of 9 C.F.R. §§ 416.1-416.17.

Required label. All poultry sold from the farm, at a farmers’ market, or to a food restaurant pursuant to the exemption in subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this section shall be labeled with the following information:

Name of farm and name of producer.

Address of farm, including zip code.

“Exempt per

6 V.S.A. § 3312(b)

: NOT INSPECTED.” This statement shall be prominently displayed with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words or statements, designs, or devices in the labeling) as to render it likely to be read and understood under customary conditions of purchase and use.

Safe handling and cooking instructions as follows:

“SAFE HANDLING INSTRUCTIONS:

Keep refrigerated or frozen. Thaw in refrigerator or microwave.

Keep raw poultry separate from other foods.

Wash working surfaces, including cutting boards, utensils, and hands after touching raw poultry.

Cook thoroughly to an internal temperature of at least 165 degrees Fahrenheit maintained for at least 15 seconds.

Keep hot foods hot. Refrigerate leftovers immediately or discard.”

Menu items; label. Any menu item that includes poultry that is exempt under this section shall clearly state the name of the farm from which the poultry was purchased and shall prominently display the words “poultry processed on the farm and not inspected” on the menu in proximity to the menu item. Poultry sold to food restaurants under the exemption in this section shall include a label alerting the purchaser to these labeling requirements.

Food restaurant; signed statement. The poultry producer, upon first selling poultry to a food restaurant, must procure a signed statement from the food restaurant stating that the food restaurant is aware that the poultry is exempted from inspection under subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this section, and that the menu of the food restaurant must have the information required by subsection (e) of this section. The poultry producer must keep the signed statement on file as long as the producer is selling poultry to the food restaurant under this section. The poultry producer must have a signed statement on file from each food restaurant to which poultry is sold under this section and an exact copy of each statement, including the name of the producer and the name of the purchasing restaurant shall be forwarded to the Department of Health.

Approved label. Prior to selling poultry products slaughtered pursuant to the exemption in subsection (c) or (d) of this section, a poultry producer shall submit to the Secretary for approval a copy of the label that the poultry producer proposes to use for compliance with the requirements of subsection (e) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2007, No. 38

, § 8, eff. May 21, 2007;

2017, No. 52

, § 2, eff. May 30, 2017.

§ 3313.
Inspection and seal.

No inspection of products placed in any container at any official establishment shall be deemed to be complete until the products are sealed or enclosed under the supervision of an inspector.

For purposes of any inspection of products required by this chapter, inspectors shall have access at all times, by day or night, to any part of an establishment required to have inspection under this chapter, whether the establishment is operated or not.

For purposes of any periodic review of any licensed establishment, inspectors shall have access during normal business hours to every part of a licensed establishment required to have inspection under this chapter, whether the establishment is operated or not.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986.

§ 3314.
Detention.

When any livestock product or poultry product or any product exempted from the definition of a livestock product and from the definition of a poultry product, or any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry, is found by any authorized representative of the Secretary upon premises where it is held for purposes of, or during or after distribution in, intrastate commerce, or is otherwise subject to the chapter, and there is reason to believe that any product is adulterated or misbranded and is capable of use as human food, or that it has not been inspected, in violation of the provisions of this chapter or of the Federal Meat Inspection Act or the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act or the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, or that the product or animal has been or is intended to be, distributed in violation of any of these provisions, it may be detained by a representative for a period not to exceed 30 days, pending action under section 3315 of this title or notification of any federal authorities having jurisdiction over the product or animal.
The product or animal shall not be moved by any person from the place at which it is located when detained, until released by the representative.
All official marks may be required by the representative to be removed from the product or animal before it is released unless it appears to the satisfaction of the Secretary or his or her designee that the product or animal is eligible to retain the marks.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3315.
Forfeiture.

Any livestock product or poultry product of any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry that is being transported in intrastate commerce, or is otherwise subject to this chapter, or is held for sale in this State after transportation, and that:

is or has been prepared, sold, transported, or otherwise distributed or offered or received for distribution in violation of this chapter, or the rules promulgated under it; or

is capable of use as human food and is adulterated or misbranded; or

in any other way is in violation of this chapter, shall be liable to be proceeded against and seized and condemned, at any time, on a complaint in any Superior Court as provided in section 3316 of this title. If the product or animal is condemned it shall, after entry of the decree, be disposed of by destruction or sale as the court may direct and the proceeds, if sold, less the court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses, shall be paid into the Treasury of this State. The product or animal shall not be sold contrary to the provisions of this chapter, the Federal Meat Inspection Act, the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, or the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. Upon the execution and delivery of a good and sufficient bond guaranteeing that the product or animal shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or the laws of the United States, the court may direct that the product or animal be delivered to the owner subject to the supervision by authorized representatives of the Secretary as is necessary to ensure compliance with the applicable laws. When a decree of condemnation is entered against the product or animal and it is released under bond, or destroyed, court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses shall be awarded against the person, if any, intervening as claimant of the product or animal.

The provisions of this section shall in no way impair authority for condemnation or seizure conferred by other provisions of this chapter, or other laws.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3316.
Appeal and jurisdiction.

Any order issued under subdivision 3304(3) of this title, subdivision 3305(1), (2), or (3) of this title, subsection 3306(e) of this title, or a decision issued by the Secretary under subsection 3306(c) of this title shall be final unless appealed to a Superior Court within 15 days after service. An appeal of any other order or decision of the Secretary may be taken pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25. Review of any order and the determinations upon which it is based shall be upon the record in the administrative proceeding in which the order was issued.

The Superior Court has legal and equitable jurisdiction to enforce, prevent, and restrain violations of this chapter and has legal and equitable jurisdiction in all other cases arising under this chapter. The Superior Courts are granted jurisdiction to handle criminal matters arising under this chapter and rules.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 59.

§ 3317.
Penalties; generally.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or the rules promulgated under this chapter, for which no other criminal penalty is provided by this chapter shall upon conviction be subject to imprisonment for not more than one year, or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. However, if the violation involves intent to defraud, or any distribution or attempted distribution of a product that is adulterated except as defined in subdivision 3302(1)(K) of this title, the person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than three years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the Secretary to report for prosecution or for the institution of libel or injunction proceedings minor violations of this chapter whenever he or she believes that the public interest will be adequately served by a suitable written notice of warning.

Any person who violates this chapter or any rule adopted by the Secretary under this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for each violation. A civil penalty may be imposed by the Washington Superior Court, or by any other Superior Court. The Superior Court shall consider the size of the business of the person charged, the effect on the person’s ability to continue in business, and the gravity of the violation in assessing a civil penalty. Whenever the Secretary finds that the violation occurred despite the exercise of due care, he or she may issue a warning instead of seeking a penalty.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3318.
Investigation; record keeping.

The Secretary shall also have power:

To gather and compile information and to investigate the organization, business, conduct, practices, and management of any person engaged in intrastate commerce, and the relationship to other persons.

To require, by general or special orders, persons engaged in intrastate commerce to file with the Secretary, in the form that the Secretary may prescribe, annual or special reports or answers in writing to specific questions. The person filing the reports or answers shall furnish the Secretary with any information he or she may require as to the organization, business, conduct, practices, management, and relation to other persons. The reports and answers shall be made under oath, or otherwise, as the Secretary may prescribe, and shall be filed with the Secretary within a reasonable period as the Secretary may prescribe, unless additional time is granted by the Secretary.

For the purpose of this chapter, the Secretary shall at all reasonable times have access to and the right to copy any documentary evidence of any person being investigated or proceeded against. The Secretary may subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of all documentary evidence of any person relating to any matter under investigation or subject to administrative hearing. The Secretary or his or her designee may sign subpoenas and may administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence.

The attendance of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence may be required at any designated place of hearing. In case of disobedience to a subpoena the Secretary may invoke the aid of any district or Superior Court in requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence.

Any district or Superior Court within the jurisdiction in which an inquiry is carried on may, in case of resistance or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, issue an order requiring the person to appear before the Secretary or to produce documentary evidence or to give evidence touching the matter in question. Any failure to obey an order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt.

Upon the application of the Attorney General of this State at the request of the Secretary, the Superior Courts shall have jurisdiction to issue preliminary or permanent injunctions commanding any person to comply with the provisions of this chapter or any order of the Secretary made pursuant to this chapter.

The Secretary may order testimony to be taken by deposition in any proceeding or investigation pending under this chapter at any stage of the proceeding or investigation. The depositions may be taken before any person designated by the Secretary who has the power to administer oaths. The testimony shall be reduced to writing by the person taking the deposition, or under his or her direction, and shall be subscribed by the deponent. Any person may be compelled to appear and depose and to produce documentary evidence in the same manner as witnesses may be compelled to appear and testify and produce documentary evidence before the Secretary as provided in this chapter.

Witnesses summoned before the Secretary shall be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid witnesses in the courts of this State. Witnesses whose depositions are taken and the persons taking the same shall each be entitled to the same fees as are paid for like services in the courts.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, schedules of charges, contracts, agreements, or other documentary evidence before the Secretary. No person shall be excused from obeying a subpoena of the Secretary, whether the subpoena is signed or issued by him or her or his or her designee, or in any proceeding, criminal or otherwise, based upon any alleged violation of this chapter on the ground that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him or her or by the subpoena may tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her or it to a penalty or forfeiture. No individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to a penalty or forfeiture for any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she is compelled, after having claimed his or her privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, except that any individual so testifying shall not be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in testifying.

Any person who neglects or refuses to attend and testify or to answer any lawful inquiry, or to produce documentary evidence, if in his or her power to do so, in obedience to the subpoena or lawful requirement of the Secretary or his or her designee shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000.00 nor more than $5,000.00, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

Any person who willfully makes, or causes to be made, any false entry or statement of fact or who willfully fails to make correct entries in any report, account, record, or memorandum kept by any person which is required by or subject to this chapter or who willfully removes out of the jurisdiction of this State, or willfully mutilates, alters, or by any other means falsifies any documentary evidence of any person subject to this chapter or who willfully refuses to submit to the Secretary or to any of his or her authorized agents, for the purpose of inspection and taking copies, any documentary evidence of any person subject to this chapter in his or her possession or within his or her control, shall upon conviction be subject to a fine of not less than $1,000.00 nor more than $5,000.00, or to imprisonment for not more than three years, or both.

If any person required by this chapter fails to file any annual or special report within the time fixed by the Secretary, and the failure continues for 30 days after notice of default, the person shall forfeit $100.00 after notice to the State for each day. The forfeiture shall be payable into the Treasury of this State, and shall be recoverable in a civil suit in the name of the State brought in the county where the person has his or her or its principal office or in Washington Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 33.

§ 3319.
Skilled meat cutter training.

The Secretary shall issue a request for proposals to develop a curriculum and provide classroom and on-the-job training for the occupation of skilled meat cutter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 52

, § 41, eff. May 27, 2011.